California, session 20252026, AB2621.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1041 of the Financial Code is amended to read:1041. The articles of incorporation of the proposed bank or trust company shall be submitted to the commissioner for his or her their approval before they are filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Corporations Code. After the articles have been filed with the Secretary of State the proposed bank or trust company shall:(a) File with the commissioner a copy of its articles of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of State.(b) File with the commissioner a statement in the form and with any supporting data as the commissioner may require showing that the entire contributed capital has been fully paid in lawful money, unconditionally, and that the funds representing the contributed capital, less sums spent as authorized by this article for preopening expenditures are on deposit in a state or national bank in this state, subject to withdrawal on demand.(c) Pay to the commissioner a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).